Utah statutes.
11-42-702.   Reserve fund.
(1)  In lieu of creating and funding a guaranty fund under Section 11-42-701
for an issue of assessment bonds or refunding assessment bonds, a local entity
may establish a reserve fund to secure the issue.
(2)  If a local entity establishes a reserve fund under this section:
(a)  the bonds secured by the reserve fund are not secured by a guaranty fund
under Section 11-42-701;
(b)  the local entity is not required to fund a guaranty fund under Section
11-42-701 for those bonds; and
(c)  unless otherwise provided in this part or in the proceedings authorizing
the issuance of bonds, the provisions of this part regarding a guaranty fund
have no application to the bonds that are secured by the reserve fund.
(3)  Each local entity that establishes a reserve fund shall:
(a)  fund and replenish the reserve fund in the amounts and manner provided in
the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds that are secured by the
reserve fund; and
(b)  invest the funds on deposit in the reserve fund as provided in Title 51,
Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(4) (a)  Subject to Subsection (4)(b), a local entity may replenish a reserve
fund under this section by any of the methods described in Subsection
11-42-701(1)(b).
(b)  The proceedings authorizing the issuance of assessment bonds or refunding
assessment bonds shall provide that if a local entity uses any of the methods
described in Subsection 11-42-701(1)(b) to replenish a reserve fund, the local
entity shall be reimbursed, with interest at a rate that the local entity
determines, with money that the local entity receives from foreclosing on
delinquent property.
(5)  Upon the retirement of bonds secured by a reserve fund, the local entity
shall:
(a)  terminate the reserve fund; and
(b)  disburse all remaining money in the fund as provided in the proceedings
authorizing the issuance of the bonds.
